Washington statutes.
RCW 19.300.020

Identity theft or fraud—Penalty.

A person that intentionally scans another person's identification device remotely, without that person's prior knowledge and prior consent, for the purpose of fraud, identity theft, or for any other illegal purpose, shall be guilty of a class C felony.

[ 2008 c 138 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Conflict with federal requirements—2008 c 138: See notes following RCW 19.300.010.